Utah statutes.
73-3-4.   "Received," "filed" defined.

Whenever in this title the word "received" is used with reference to any paper deposited in the office of the state engineer, it shall be deemed to mean the date when such paper was first deposited in the state engineer's office; and whenever the term "filed" is used, it shall be deemed to mean the date when such paper was acceptably completed in form and substance and filed in said office.

